Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 5 Commission on Interstate Cooperation
4. Acts 1981, No. 883.

the State Department of Education and the State Board of Education, created by Section 3 of Act 169 of 1931, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-102, which were transferred to the Department of Education under the provisions of Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-910;

the Local Services Advisory Council, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Comprehensive State Health Planning Agency, created by Section 1 of Act 305 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2301, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904, and which was transferred to the State Health Planning and Development Agency by Section 7 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3607;

the Health Planning Advisory Council, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, formerly the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Workshop-Made Products Committee, created by Section 1 of Act 405 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 14-229; which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Arkansas Highway Retirement System, created by Section 2 of Act 454 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 76-1902;

the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, created by Section 16 of Act 93 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-1436;

the State Police Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 311 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-451;

the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, created by Section 2 of 365 of 1953, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 22-902;

the Arkansas Quasi-Judicial Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 148 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2701;

the State Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 1977 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

the County Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

The following, to be terminated on June 30, 1983, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare and Labor:

The Inhalation Therapy Examination Committee, created by Section 3 of Act 168 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1603.

The following, to be terminated on June 30, 1983, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on City, County and Local Affairs:

The Department of Local Services, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

The Office of Local and Regional Services within the Department of Local Services, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

The Office of Economic Opportunity, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 1 of Act 278 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

The Department of Aeronautics, created by Section 1 of Act 457 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 74-102, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904.

The following subsections of Section 3 of Act 683 of 1979 are hereby repealed: subsection (1) of subsection (a); subsections (1) through (3) of subsection (b); subsections (5) and (6) of subsection (b); subsections (1) and (2) of subsection (c); subsections (1) and (2) of subsection (d); and subsections (1) through (12) of subsection (e).

Section 2 of Act 1021 of 1979 is hereby repealed.

5. Acts 1983, No. 764.

the Advisory Council for Vocational-Technical Education, created by Section 1 of Act 483 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2570;

the Advisory Committee of the State Board of Education, created by Section 3 of Act 416 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4302;

the Quapaw Vocational-Technical School; the Pines Vocational-Technical School; the Rich Mountain Vocational-Technical School; the Southwest Vocational-Technical School; the Twin Lakes Vocational-Technical School; the White River Vocational-Technical School; the Northwest Vocational-Technical School; the Gateway Vocational-Technical School; the Petit Jean Vocational-Technical School; the Ozarka Vocational-Technical School; the Ouachita Vocational-Technical School; the Oil Belt Vocational-Technical School; the Little Rock Vocational-Technical School; the Great Rivers Vocational-Technical School; the Forest Echoes Vocational-Technical School; the Arkansas Valley Vocational-Technical School; the Black River Vocational-Technical School; the Cossatot Vocational-Technical School; the Cotton Boll Vocational-Technical School; the Crowley's Ridge Vocational-Technical School; the Delta Vocational-Technical School; the Foothills Vocational-Technical School; the Rice Belt Vocational-Technical School; and the Red River Vocational-Technical School, as authorized by Section 3 of Act 328 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2559;

the Westark Community College and the Phillips County Community College, authorized by Section 5 of Act 103 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-4205;

the Advisory Council for Education of the Handicapped, created by Section 15 of Act 102 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2129;

the Arkansas Post-Secondary Education Planning Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 926 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3349.1;

the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Division of Social Services of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the State Hospital Board, created by Section 1 of Act 433 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 59-201, which was transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Arkansas Children's Colony Board, created by Section 2 of Act 6 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 59-1102, and the Arkansas Children's Colony at Conway, McRae, Arkadelphia, Jonesboro, Booneville, and Warren, created pursuant to Section 1 of Act 186 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 59-1117, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Arkansas Department of Mental Retardation and the Arkansas Board of Mental Retardation, created by Section 2 of Act 265 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 59-1002, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Division of Rehabilitation of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the State Department of Public Welfare, and Board of Public Welfare, created by Section 2 of Act 280 of 1939, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-102, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Rehabilitation Service, created by Section 5 of Act 43 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2544, and the Rehabilitation Services for the Blind, created by Section 1 of Act 180 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2566, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Arkansas Juvenile Training School Department, and the Arkansas Juvenile Training School Board, created by Section 2 of Act 20 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 46-302, which were transferred to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services by Section 12 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912;

the Division of Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Services of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 2 of Act 340 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-912.2;

the State Board of Health, created by Section 1 of Act 96 of 1913, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-101, which was transferred to the Department of Health by Section 11 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-911;

the State Medical Examiner Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 321 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-611;

the Board of Massage, created by Section 6 of Act 180 of 1951, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1205;

the Radiation Control Agency, created by Section 4 of Act 8 of 1961 (Second Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1515;

the Board of Examiners in Speech Pathology and Audiology, created by Section 4 of Act 277 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1803;

the Medical Services Advisory Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 372 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 7-601;

the Mobile Home Commission, created by Section 14 of Act 510 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3014;

the Employment Security Advisory Council, created by Section 11 of Act 391 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1114;

the State Board of Cosmetology, created by Section 2 of Article 1 of Act 358 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-815;

the Social Work Registration Board, created by Section 2 of Act 899 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2801;

the Barber Examiners' Board, created by Section 15 of Act 313 of 1937, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-515; and

the State Board of Nursing, created by Section 3 of Act 432 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-747;

the Plumber Licensing Division of the State Board of Health, created by Section 2 of Act 200 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-1206;

the Plumbers Committee of Examiners created by Section 3 of Act 200 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-1207;

the Arkansas Rural Medical Practice Student Loan and Scholarship Board, created by Section 1 of Act 131 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2908; and

the Committee on Water Well Construction, created by Section 5 of Act 641 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-2005;

the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Finance of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the State Energy Office, created by Executive Order 73-11;

the Division of Land Surveys of the State Land Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 458 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 10-1301; which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 1 of Act 579 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 10-1313;

the Interstate Oil Compact Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 86 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 53-802;

the Land Survey Advisory Board, created by Section 4 of Act 458 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 10-1304;

the Department of Industrial Development, created by Section 6 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-906;

the Overseas Program of the Department of Industrial Development, created by Section 2 of Act 1015 of 1975 (1976 Extended Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-513.1;

the Arkansas Industrial Development Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 404 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-505;

the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 14 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-118;

the Board of Registration of Professional Soil Classifiers, created by Section 1 of Act 460 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2701;

the Contractor's Licensing Board, created by Section 2 of Act 150 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-702;

the State Board of Collection Agencies, created by Section 3 of Act 145 of 1965, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2003;

the Consumer Advisory Board, created by Section 3 of Act 92 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 70-903;

the Advisory Committee for Registration of Landscape Architects, created by Section 3 of Act 353 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-2902;

the Arkansas State Board of Architects, created by Section 1 of Act 270 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-301;

the Abstractors Board of Examiners, created by Section 3 of Act 109 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-101;

the Real Estate Commission, created by Section 3 of Act 148 of 1929, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-1303;

the Athletic Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 131 of 1927, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-2903;

the State Employees' Insurance Advisory Committee, created by Section 1 of Act 48 of 1972 (Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-3101;

the Election Commissioners' Board, created by Section 2 of Article 5 of Act 465 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 3-502;

the Inhalation Therapy Examination Committee, created by Section 3 of Act 168 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1603;

the Department of Aeronautics, created by Section 1 of Act 457 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 74-102, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904; and

the Office of Economic Opportunity, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 1 of Act 278 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904.